Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.050

Sunrise notes—Preparation.

(1) The office of financial management shall prepare sunrise notes for legislation concerning the creation of new boards. The department of commerce shall prepare sunrise notes for legislation creating new types of special purpose districts.

(2) A sunrise note shall be prepared for all executive and agency request legislation that creates a board or special purpose district.

(3) The office of financial management or the department of commerce shall also provide a sunrise note at the request of any committee of the legislature.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2061; 1995 c 399 s 82; 1987 c 342 s 5.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.